Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2086.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1.1. Section 36-681, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE36-681. Governmental entities; masks; prohibition; definition A. A governmental entity may not impose on any resident of this state a requirement to wear a mask or face covering anywhere on the governmental entity's premises, except where long-standing workplace safety and infection control measures that are unrelated to COVID-19 may be required. B. The requirements of this section do not apply to a special health care district established pursuant to title 48, chapter 31. C. B. For the purposes of this section, "governmental entity" means this state and any political subdivision of this state, including the judiciary, that receives and uses state tax revenues. END_STATUTE Sec. 2.2. Section 36-685, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE36-685. Vaccinations; prohibition; definition A. Any Notwithstanding any other law requiring vaccinations in this title or title 15 or the rules adopted pursuant to those titles, a government entity may not require a resident of this state to receive a vaccination for COVID-19 or any variant of COVID-19 for any disease or virus. B. Subsection A of this section does not apply to a health care institution that is owned or operated by a government entity in this state. C. B. For the purposes of this section, "government entity" means this state and any political subdivision of this state that receives and uses tax revenues. END_STATUTE Sec. 3.3. Heading change The chapter heading of title 44, chapter 38, Arizona Revised Statutes, is changed from "BUSINESSES EXEMPT FROM MASK MANDATE" to "BUSINESSES - MASK AND VACCINATION MANDATES". Sec. 4.4. Title 44, chapter 38, article 1, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 44-7952, to read: START_STATUTE44-7952. Businesses; requirement of mask or vaccination prohibited; exception a business operating in this state may not require that a person do either of the following to enter the business's building or premises or to be employed: 1. Wear a mask or other face covering, except where long-standing workplace safety and infection control measures may be required. 2. Receive any type of vaccination. END_STATUTE